District of Columbia statutes.
47-2903

Increase of penalty provisions in § 47-2901.

In lieu of the penalties provided in § 47-2901 for the offense therein mentioned, the penalty mentioned in § 47-2902(b) is hereby substituted, and hereafter shall be applicable to and enforced, as herein provided, for any violation of § 47-2901.

Mar. 7, 1870, ch. 42, p. 22, Corp. Laws of Wash., 67th Council, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2903.
1973 Ed., § 47-2903.